DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-241
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIARI-01

DTC C1232/32 Deceleration Sensor Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Detection of either of conditions 1. and 2.:

1. At the vehicle speed of 10 km/h (6 mph) or more, when
the condition that ECU terminal GL1 signal change
range is less than 20 mV, and ECU terminal GL2 signal
change range swings by 468 mV or more occurs for 30

C1232/32 sec.ormore.

2. At the vehicle speed of 10 km/h (6 mph) or more, when
the condition that ECU terminal GL2 signal change
range is less than 20 mV, and ECU terminal GL1 signal
change range swings by 468 mV or more occurs for 30
sec. or more.

e Deceleration sensor
¢ Deceleration sensor circuit
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DI-242 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Startthe inspectionfrom step 1in case of using the hand —-heldtesterand startfrom step 2in case of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Checkoutput value ofthe yaw rate (deceleration) sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthatthe deceleration value of the deceleration sensor displayed onthe hand -heldtesteris changing
when tilting the vehicle.
OK:
Deceleration value must be changing.

e |

0K> Check and replace skid control ECU.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)



DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-243
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

2 [ Check yaw rate (deceleration) sensor.
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PREPARATION:

(@ Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.

(b) Connect VYS terminal to the batteries’ positive (+) termi-
nal, and GYAW terminal to the batteries’ negative (-) ter-
minal. Apply about 4.5 V between VYS and GYAW termi-

nals.
NOTICE:

Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VYS and

GYAW.
CHECK:

Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals when the

sensor is tilted forward and rearward.

OK:
Symbols Condition Standard Value

GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V
GL1 Lean rearward 1.0V -about2.3V
GL1 Lean forward About2.3V -35V
GL2 Horizontal About 2.3 V
GL2 Lean rearward About2.3V -3.5V
GL2 Lean forward 1.0V -about2.3V

HINT:

. If the sensor is tilted too much it may show the wrong val-

ue.

. If dropped, the sensor should be replaced with a new one.
« The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be
placed upside down.

NG> Replace yaw rate sensor.

3 | Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate (de-
celeration) sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

OK

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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